California, session 20252026, SB1332.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1025 is added to the Government Code, to read:1025. (a)   A person is ineligible for appointment to, or employment in, any civil service or exempt position with the state if the person has been employed by United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement during the period beginning January 20, 2025, and ending January 20, 2029. (b) This section shall become inoperative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by the United States Supreme Court or the California Supreme Court that Section 1 of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason, and as of that date this section is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 18720.45 of the Government Code is amended to read:18720.45. (a)  Employment forms used by a state agency shall require a person applying for employment to disclose whether the person has entered into an agreement with the state regarding any previous employment with the state that prohibits that person from seeking or accepting any subsequent employment with the state.(b) This section shall become inoperative pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1025, which specifies the inoperation date as the effective date of a final judicial determination made by the United States Supreme Court or the California Supreme Court that Section 1 of the act that added this subdivision, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason, and as of that date this section is repealed.SEC. 3. Section 18720.45 is added to the Government Code, to read:18720.45. (a)  Employment forms used by a state agency shall require a person applying for employment to disclose the following:(1) Whether the person has entered into an agreement with the state regarding any previous employment with the state that prohibits that person from seeking or accepting any subsequent employment with the state. (2) Whether the person has ever been employed by the United States Department of Homeland Security, or any of its component agencies, and, if so, the specific agency or agencies and dates of employment. (b) This section shall become operative on the effective date of a final judicial determination made by the United States Supreme Court or the California Supreme Court that Section 1 of the act that added this section, or its application, either in whole or in part, is enjoined, found unconstitutional, or held invalid for any reason.SEC. 4. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.